District of Columbia statutes.
1-1217

Authorization for appropriation; inclusion of expenses in Mayor’s annual estimates.

Appropriation is hereby authorized to be made to carry out the provisions of this section and §§ 1-1203 and 1-1206, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to include in his annual estimates provision for all expenses incident to such purposes, including the purchase of equipment and supplies and the payment of salaries to personnel.

Dec. 16, 1944, 58 Stat. 811, ch. 597, § 5
Oct. 28, 1949, 63 Stat. 972, ch. 782, title XI, § 1106(a)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(c), 25 DCR 5740
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 1-518.
1981 Ed., § 1-817.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.